Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2054.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 75TEMPORARY OPERATIONAL AND FINANCIAL ASSISTANCESec.7501. Scope of chapter.7502. Definitions.7503. Assistance for law enforcement purposes.§ 7501. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to temporary operational and financial assistance to maintain public safety and essential policing functions.12345678910111213141516171819 § 7502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Law enforcement agency." An employer of a law enforcement officer."Law enforcement officer." An individual who, by virtue of the individual's office or public employment, is vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for offenses, whether that duty extends to all offenses or is limited to specific offenses."Line-of-duty death." The death of a law enforcement officer arising out of and in the performance of official duties, including death resulting from an injury or a medical emergency incurred while on duty."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.§ 7503. Assistance for law enforcement purposes.(a) Authorization.--In the event of a line-of-duty death involving a law enforcement officer who is employed by a municipality or who is a member of the Pennsylvania State Police, the Governor may, upon request of the affected law enforcement agency or municipality, authorize the use of Commonwealth resources to provide temporary operational and financial assistance necessary to maintain public safety and essential policing functions.(b) Forms of assistance.--The assistance authorized under subsection (a) includes the following:(1) Deployment of personnel from the Pennsylvania State Police to temporarily assume patrol or administrative duties 20250HB2054PN2632 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the affected law enforcement agency or municipality.(2) Reimbursement to any neighboring law enforcement agency that provides coverage for the affected law enforcement agency or municipality under an intergovernmental cooperation agreement or informal request.(3) Financial assistance to the affected law enforcement agency or municipality for overtime or other extraordinary costs related to maintaining police operations.(4) Logistical support, including equipment, as deemed necessary by the Governor.(c) Limitations.--(1) Assistance under this section shall be limited to a period not exceeding 30 days following the line-of-duty death, unless extended by the Governor upon a determination of continuing need.(2) Financial assistance under this section may not exceed amounts appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly.(d) Administration.--The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency, in coordination with the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of State Treasurer, shall develop procedures and criteria for requesting, approving and distributing assistance under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2054PN2632 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324